test/src/morphology/myv-test-V-kundams_all_gt-norm.yaml
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундавлизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундавлизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундавлитинь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундавлинзеть
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундавлимизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1: кундыксэлинь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2: кундыксэлить
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3: кундыксэль
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1: кундыксэлинек
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2: кундыксэлиде
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3: кундыксэльть
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундыксэлия
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундыксэлик
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундыксэлизе
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундыксэлинь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундыксэлить
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундыксэлинзе
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундыксэлинек
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундыксэлинек
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундыксэлинк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундыксэлинк
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундыксэлизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундыксэлизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундыксэлитинь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундыксэлинзеть
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундыксэлидизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундыксэлидизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундыксэлидизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундыксэлидизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундыксэлидизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундыксэлидизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундыксэлимик
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундыксэлимим
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундыксэлимизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундыксэлимизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундыксэлимизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундыксэлимизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундыксэлимизь
     кундамс+V+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундыксэлимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill: кундындерямс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1: кундындерян
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2: кундындерят
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3: кундындеряй
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1: кундындерятано
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2: кундындерятадо
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3: кундындеряйть
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундындеряса
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундындерясак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундындерясы
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундындерясынь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундындерясыть
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундындерясынзе
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундындерясынек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундындерясынек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундындерясынк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундындерясынк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундындерясызь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундындерясызь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундындерятан
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундындерятанзат
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундындерятадыдзь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундындерятадыдзь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундындерятадыдзь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундындерятадыдзь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундындерятадыдзь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундындерятадыдзь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундындерясамак
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундындерясамам
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундындерясамизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундындерясамизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундындерясамизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундындерясамизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундындерясамизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+NonPast+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундындерясамизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: кундындеринь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: кундындерить
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: кундындерясь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: кундындеринек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: кундындериде
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: кундындерясть
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундындерия
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундындерик
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундындеризе
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундындеринь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундындерить
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундындеринзе
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундындеринек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундындеринек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундындеринк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундындеринк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундындеризь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундындеризь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундындеритинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундындеринзить
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундындеридизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундындеридизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундындеридизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундындеридизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундындеридизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундындеридизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундындеримик
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундындеримим
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундындеримизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундындеримизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундындеримизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундындеримизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундындеримизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундындеримизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: кундамс
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундындерилия
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундындерилик
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундындерилизе
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундындерилинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундындерилить
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундындерилинзе
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундындерилинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундындерилинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундындерилинк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундындерилинк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундындерилизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундындерилизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундындерилитинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундындерилинзеть
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундындерилидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундындерилидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундындерилидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундындерилидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундындерилидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундындерилидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундындерилимик
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундындерилимим
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундындерилимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундындерилимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундындерилимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундындерилимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундындерилимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундындерилимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1: кундындерявлинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2: кундындерявлить
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3: кундындеряволь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1: кундындерявлинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2: кундындерявлиде
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3: кундындерявольть
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундындерявлия
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундындерявлик
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундындерявлизе
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундындерявлинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундындерявлить
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундындерявлинзе
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундындерявлинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундындерявлинек
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундындерявлинк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундындерявлинк
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундындерявлизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундындерявлизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундындерявлитинь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундындерявлинзеть
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундындерявлидизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундындерявлимик
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундындерявлимим
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Ындеря+Cond+V+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундындерявлимизь
     кундамс+V+Der/Омс+Inf+Ill+Foc/Гак: кундамскак
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px1Sg+Foc/Гак: кундамозонгак
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px2Sg+Foc/Гак: кундамозоткак
     кундамс+V+Der/ОмО+Inf+Ill+Px3Sg+Foc/Гак: кундамозонзояк
